Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 2. Consolidation or Merger

§ 1501.
Procedure.

The word “persons” as used in sections 42 and 1925 of this title shall apply to and include churches and religious or ecclesiastical corporations or societies.
Churches and religious or ecclesiastical corporations or societies desiring to unite and form a corporation under the provisions of chapters 1 and 17 of this title shall hold meetings of their members to vote upon the question. Notices of such meetings and of the fact that the question of forming a corporation under the terms of such chapters is to be considered thereat shall be sent to all of the members of such churches, societies, or corporations.
Voting at such meetings may be in person or by proxy, and a majority of the votes cast at such a meeting shall be necessary to determine the question of forming a corporation.

§ 1502.
Signing and filing of articles.

In case it is voted to form a new corporation, a church, or religious or ecclesiastical corporation or society so voting, at the meeting when such vote is taken, shall authorize the secretary of such corporation or society to sign the name of such corporation or society to the articles of association of such new corporation.
There shall be filed with the articles of association of such new corporation an attested copy of the minutes of the meeting of each corporation or society at which it was voted to form such new corporation.
Upon the filing of the articles of association in the Office of the Secretary of State as required by section 1927 of this title, all rights, title, and interest of each church or religious or ecclesiastical corporation or society signing such articles of association shall vest in such new corporation.